Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 48
SMOKE MANAGEMENT AND CROP RESIDUE DISPOSAL

Sec.

§ 22-4801. Legislative findings and intent. [Repealed.]

§ 22-4802. Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 22-4803. Agricultural field burning. [Repealed.]

§ 22-4803A. Violations — Penalties — Inspection

Complaints. [Repealed.]

§ 22-4804. Registered counties — Agricultural burning fees — Account — Rules — Research

Management program. [Repealed.]